Hawaii statutes.
§183D-3 Rules. Subject to chapter 91,
the department shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules:

(1) Concerning the preservation, protection,
regulation, extension, and utilization of, and conditions for entry into
wildlife sanctuaries, game management areas, and public hunting areas
designated by the department;

(2) Protecting, conserving, monitoring, propagating,
and harvesting wildlife;

(3) Concerning size limits, bag limits, open and
closed seasons, and specifications of hunting gear which may be used or
possessed; and

(4) Setting fees for activities permitted under this
chapter, unless otherwise provided for by law.

The rules may vary from county to county or in any
part of the county and may specify certain days of the week or certain hours of
the day in designating open seasons, except that any fees established by rule
shall be the same for each county. All rules shall have the force and effect
of law. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1988, c 12, §1]

Case Notes

Sections 183D-22 and 183D-10.5 provided the authority for the
department of land and natural resources to require payment of a fee for a
hunting-related article such as a stamp; however, since game bird hunting was
an activity permitted under this chapter, the department was required under this
section to adopt a rule pursuant to §91-3 when setting the stamp fees for
hunting. 117 H. 16 (App.), 175 P.3d 126.

Since the addition of two extra hunting days to each week of
the hunting season concerned "conditions for entry into game management areas,
and public hunting areas designated by the department of land and natural
resources" and "open seasons" for hunting, the express language
of this section mandated that in order to add the two weekdays for bird
hunting, the department had to amend Hawaii administrative rule 13-122-4
pursuant to chapter 91. 117 H. 16 (App.), 175 P.3d 126.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next